Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB616.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 278.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Under rules prescribed by the commission, each utility shall file with the
commission, within such time and in such form as the commission designates,
schedules showing all rates and conditions for service established by it and
collected or enforced. The utility shall keep copies of its schedules open to public
inspection under such rules as the commission prescribes.
(2) No utility shall charge, demand, collect, or receive from any person a greater or less
compensation for any service rendered or to be rendered than that prescribed in its
filed schedules, and no person shall receive any service from any utility for a
compensation greater or less than that prescribed in such schedules.
(3) The provisions of this section do not require disclosure or publication of a provision
of a special contract that contains rates and conditions of service not filed in a
utility's general schedule if such provision would otherwise be entitled to be
excluded from the application of KRS 61.870 to 61.884 under the provisions of
KRS 61.878(1)(c)1.
(4) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning January 1, 2026,
an investor-owned electric utility subject to the requirements of this chapter shall
not collect taxes, fees, or other amounts imposed on its customers by any other
governmental unit. Notwithstanding KRS 278.183, 278.285, and 278.287, the
commission shall not approve surcharges for an investor-owned electric utility
relating to environmental compliance, demand-side management, and voluntary
energy cost assistance, and the investor-owned utility shall not collect from the
ratepayer any amounts except for the recovery of those amounts directly and
exclusively related to the provision of electric utility service that have been
approved by the commission. Investor-owned electric utilities shall have ninety
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 7:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1870
(90) days from the effective date of this section to file new tariffs in conformance
with this section.
Section 2. This Act takes effect December 30, 2025.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 7:26 PM Jacketed